Illinois, session 104th, SB143.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Judicial Campaign Reform Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act: 7    "Allowable contribution" means a qualifying contribution, 8a seed money contribution, or a personal contribution 9authorized by this Act. 10    "Candidate" means any person seeking election to the 11office of Judge of the Supreme Court or Judge of the Appellate 12Court. 13    "Campaign" includes the primary election campaign period 14and the general election campaign period. 15    "Clean judicial race" means an election in which all 16candidates are eligible candidates who will receive a public 17financing benefit under this Act. 18    "General election campaign period" means the period 19beginning on the day after the general primary election and 20ending on the day of the general election. 21    "Electioneering communication expenditure" means an 22expenditure for electioneering communications as that term is 23defined in Article 9 of the Election Code.   SB0143- 2 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1    "Eligible candidate" means a candidate who qualifies for 2public financing by collecting the required number of 3qualifying contributions, making all required reports and 4disclosures, and being certified by the State Board of 5Elections as being in compliance with this Act. 6    "Excess qualifying contribution amount" means the amount 7of qualifying contributions accepted by a candidate that 8exceeds the dollar amount of contributions required to qualify 9a candidate for a public financing benefit. 10    "Exploratory period" means the period that begins one year 11before the general primary election date and ends on the day 12before the beginning of the primary election campaign. 13    "Fair election debit card" means a debit card issued by 14the State Treasurer in accordance with Section 65 entitling a 15candidate and agents of the candidate designated by the 16candidate to draw money from an account maintained by the 17State Treasurer to make expenditures authorized by law. 18    "Fund" means the Illinois Judicial Election Democracy 19Trust Fund, a special fund created in the State treasury for 20use, subject to appropriation, by the State Board of Elections 21for the funding of campaigns for eligible candidates. 22    "Immediate family", when used with reference to a 23candidate, includes the candidate's spouse, parents, and 24children. 25    "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure by a person 26expressly advocating the election or defeat of a clearly   SB0143- 3 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1identified candidate that is made without cooperation or 2consultation with a candidate, or any political committee or 3agent of a candidate, and that is not made in concert with, or 4at the request or suggestion of, any candidate or any 5political committee or agent of a candidate. 6    "Nonparticipating candidate" means a candidate who does 7not apply for a public financing benefit or who otherwise is 8ineligible or fails to qualify for a public financing benefit 9under this Act. 10    "Personal funds" means funds contributed by a candidate or 11a member of a candidate's immediate family. 12    "Primary election campaign period" means the period that 13begins 30 days after the last day prescribed by law for filing 14nomination papers and ends on the day of the general primary 15election. 16    "Public financing qualifying period" means the period 17beginning on July 1 of an odd-numbered year and ending on the 18day before the beginning of the primary election campaign 19period for the office of Judge of the Supreme Court or Judge of 20the Appellate Court. 21    "Qualifying contribution" means a contribution made during 22the public financing qualifying period that is between $5 and 23$100, and that is made, to a candidate, by an individual who is 24at least 18 years old and resides in the district in which the 25candidate seeks office, and that is acknowledged by written 26receipt identifying the contributor.  SB0143- 4 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1    "Qualifying report" means a list of all individual 2qualifying contributions. 3    "Seed money contribution" means (1) a contribution in an 4amount not more than $1,000 made to a candidate during the 5exploratory period or the public financing qualifying period 6or (2) a contribution made to a candidate during the 7exploratory period or the public financing qualifying period 8consisting of personal funds of the candidate in an amount not 9more than the amount authorized under Section 20.10    "State Board" means the State Board of Elections.  11    Section 10. Alternative judicial campaign financing 12option. There is established an alternative campaign financing 13option available to candidates running for office of Judge of 14the Supreme Court or Judge of the Appellate Court. This 15alternative campaign financing option is available to 16candidates for elections to be held beginning in the year 172027. The State Board shall administer this Act and the Fund. 18Candidates receiving public financing benefits under this Act 19shall also comply with all other applicable election and 20campaign laws, rules, and regulations. 21    Section 15. The Illinois Judicial Election Democracy Trust 22Fund. 23    (a) The Illinois Judicial Election Democracy Trust Fund is 24established as a special fund in the State treasury to finance   SB0143- 5 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1the election campaigns of eligible candidates running for 2office of Judge of the Supreme Court or Judge of the Appellate 3Court and to pay administrative and enforcement costs of the 4State Board related to this Act. Any interest generated by the 5Fund is credited to the Fund. The State Board shall administer 6the Fund. 7    (b) The following shall be deposited into the Fund: 8        (1) At the direction of the State Board, the 9    Comptroller shall direct and the Treasurer shall transfer 10    $40,000,000 of the revenues from the taxes imposed by the 11    Illinois Income Tax Act and credited to the General 12    Revenue Fund, transferred to the Fund by the State 13    Treasurer on or before January 1 of each year, beginning 14    January 1, 2026. If the State Board determines that the 15    Fund will not have sufficient revenues to cover the likely 16    demand for funds from the Fund in an upcoming calendar 17    year, by January 1 the State Board shall provide a report 18    of its projections of the balances in the Fund to the 19    General Assembly and the Governor and may request that the 20    State Treasurer make the following transfers to the Fund 21    from the General Revenue Fund: 22            (A) Up to $20,000,000, no later than February 28, 23        2026, reflecting an advance of the transfer of the 24        amounts that would be received on or before January 1, 25        2027 under this paragraph. 26            (B) Up to $15,000,000, no later than July 31,   SB0143- 6 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1        2026, reflecting an advance of the transfer of the 2        amounts that would be received on or before January 1, 3        2027 under this paragraph. 4            (C) Up to $5,000,000, no later than September 1, 5        2028, reflecting a partial advance of the transfer of 6        the amounts that would be received on or before 7        January 1, 2029 under this paragraph. 8        (2) Revenue from a tax checkoff program allowing a 9    resident of the State who files a tax return with the 10    Department of Revenue to designate that $3 be paid into 11    the Fund. In the case of spouses filing a joint return, 12    each spouse may designate that not less than $3 be paid 13    into the Fund. The Department of Revenue shall report 14    annually the amounts designated for the Fund to the State 15    Treasurer, who shall transfer that amount to the Fund. 16        (3) Any excess qualifying contributions or seed money 17    contributions that exceed the allotted total in Section 18    20. 19        (4) Fund revenues that were distributed to an eligible 20    candidate and that remain unspent after the candidate has 21    lost a primary election or after all general elections. 22        (5) Other unspent Fund revenues distributed to any 23    eligible candidate who does not remain a candidate 24    throughout a primary or general election cycle. 25        (6) Voluntary donations made directly to the Fund. 26    Individuals and other entities may make direct voluntary   SB0143- 7 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1    contributions to the Fund, not to exceed $1,000 per 2    individual or entity per calendar year.3        (7) Fines collected under this Act. 4    (c) By September 1 preceding each year in which there is an 5election for the office of Judge of the Supreme Court or Judge 6of the Appellate Court, the State Board shall publish an 7estimate of revenue in the Fund available for distribution to 8eligible candidates during the upcoming year's elections and 9an estimate of the likely demand for public financing during 10that election. The State Board may submit a request to the 11General Assembly to request additional funding. 12    Section 20. Terms of participation. 13    (a) Before a candidate for nomination in the general 14primary election may be certified as an eligible candidate, 15the candidate shall file a declaration of intent to seek 16certification as an eligible candidate and to comply with the 17requirements of this Act. The declaration of intent shall be 18filed with the State Board prior to or during the qualifying 19period and in accordance with forms and procedures developed 20by the State Board. An eligible candidate shall submit a 21declaration of intent within 5 business days after collecting 22qualifying contributions under this Act, or the qualifying 23contributions collected before the declaration of intent has 24been filed will not be applied toward the eligibility 25requirement in subsection (c).   SB0143- 8 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1    (b) After becoming a candidate and before certification as 2an eligible candidate, a candidate may not accept 3contributions, except for seed money contributions, including 4personal funds. A candidate shall limit the candidate's 5personal funds and seed money contributions to the following 6amounts: 7        (1) The personal funds of a candidate contributed as 8    seed money contributions may not exceed an aggregate 9    amount of $25,000 for a candidate seeking nomination for 10    the Supreme Court or Appellate Court in the First Judicial 11    District and $15,000 for a candidate seeking nomination 12    for the Supreme Court or the Appellate Court for a 13    Judicial District other than the First Judicial District. 14    No eligible candidate may make any expenditure derived 15    from personal funds after the close of the public 16    financing qualifying period. Eligible candidates shall not 17    loan personal funds to their campaign.18        (2) A candidate may accept seed money contributions 19    from any individual or political committee before the end 20    of the public financing qualifying period, so long as the 21    total contributions from one contributor, except personal 22    funds and qualifying contributions otherwise permitted 23    under this Act, do not exceed $1,000 and the aggregate 24    contributions, including personal funds, but not including 25    qualifying contributions, do not exceed $75,000 for a 26    candidate seeking nomination for the Supreme Court or   SB0143- 9 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1    Appellate Court in the First Judicial District and $45,000 2    for a candidate seeking nomination for the Supreme Court 3    or Appellate Court for a Judicial District, other that the 4    First Judicial District. 5    As used in this Section, "personal funds" includes funds 6from the candidate's immediate family.7    (c) The State Board shall certify a candidate as an 8eligible candidate for receipt of public financing for a 9primary election if the candidate complies with subsection (a) 10and receives from individual qualifying contributors before 11the close of the public financing qualifying period qualifying 12contributions that total at least $25,000 for a candidate 13seeking nomination for the Supreme Court or Appellate Court in 14the First Judicial District or qualifying contributions that 15total at least $15,000 for a candidate seeking nomination for 16the Supreme Court or Appellate Court for a Judicial District, 17other than the First Judicial District. The State Board may 18require candidates to file lists of qualifying contributions 19in an electronic format. If so required, the State Board shall 20either provide, without charge, all software necessary to 21comply with this requirement or ensure that the necessary 22software is commonly available to the public at minimal cost. 23    (d) Each candidate shall acknowledge each qualifying 24contribution by providing a receipt to the contributor that 25contains the contributor's name and home address and shall 26file a report of all qualifying contributions with the State   SB0143- 10 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1Board. 2    (e) The State Board shall verify a candidate's compliance 3with the requirements of subsection (d) by any verification 4and sampling techniques that the State Board considers 5appropriate. 6    (f) Qualifying contributions and seed money contributions 7may be used only for the purpose of making an expenditure 8authorized by law. 9    (g) A candidate shall return to the State Board all 10qualifying contributions, seed money, and personal 11contributions, including in-kind contributions, that exceed 12the limits prescribed by this Section within 48 hours after 13the end of the exploratory period. The State Board shall 14deposit all contributions returned under this Section into the 15Fund. 16    (h) An eligible candidate who accepts a public financing 17benefit under this Act during the primary election campaign 18period shall agree to comply with all requirements of this Act 19throughout the general election campaign period as a 20precondition to receipt of public financing. An eligible 21candidate who accepts a public financing benefit during a 22primary election campaign period may not elect to accept 23private contributions in violation of this Act during the 24corresponding general election campaign period. 25    Section 25. Certification as an eligible candidate for a   SB0143- 11 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1primary election; distributions of funds. 2    (a) The State Board shall certify a candidate complying 3with the requirements of Section 20 as an eligible candidate 4as soon as possible. The State Board shall only certify a 5candidate who is running unopposed or will run in a clean 6judicial race. The State Board shall not certify a candidate 7as an eligible candidate if the candidate is running against a 8candidate who does not receive a public financing benefit 9under this Act. An eligible candidate certified under this Act 10shall comply with all requirements of this Act after 11certification and throughout the primary and general election 12periods and failure to do so is a violation of this Act. 13    (b) After certification, an eligible candidate shall limit 14the candidate's campaign expenditures and obligations, 15including outstanding obligations, to qualifying 16contributions, seed money contributions, revenues distributed 17to the candidate from the Fund, and interest earned on moneys 18in the Fund, and the candidate may not accept any other 19contributions unless specifically authorized by the State 20Board.21    (c) All revenues distributed to an eligible candidate from 22the Fund shall be used for campaign-related purposes. The 23candidate, the treasurer, the candidate's political committee, 24or any agent of the candidate and committee shall only use 25these revenues for campaign-related purposes. The State Board 26shall publish guidelines outlining permissible   SB0143- 12 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1campaign-related expenditures. 2    (d) The State Board shall distribute to eligible 3candidates revenues from the Fund in amounts as follows: 4        (1) for a primary election in the First Judicial 5    District, $25,000; and6        (2) for a primary election in all judicial districts 7    except the First Judicial District, $15,000.8    (e) The State Board shall distribute to each eligible 9candidate at the general primary election a line of credit for 10public financing promptly after the candidate demonstrates the 11candidate's eligibility but later than 5 days after the end of 12the public financing qualifying period. However, no candidate 13may use a line of credit distributed under this subsection 14until the beginning of the primary election campaign period. 15    Section 30. Certification as an eligible candidate for a 16general election; distributions of funds. 17    (a) Before a candidate may be certified as eligible for 18receipt of public financing for the general election, the 19candidate shall apply to the State Board and file a sworn 20statement that the candidate has fulfilled all of the 21requirements of this Act during the primary election campaign 22period, has won the nomination in the general primary, and 23will comply with the requirements of this Act during the 24general election campaign period. The application shall be 25filed no later than the 7th day after the date of the general   SB0143- 13 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1primary election. 2    (b) The State Board shall certify a candidate as an 3eligible candidate for receipt of public financing for a 4general election campaign period if the candidate complies 5with subsection (a) and the candidate was an eligible 6candidate during the primary election campaign period. The 7State Board shall only certify a candidate who is running 8unopposed or will run in a clean judicial race. The State Board 9shall not certify a candidate as an eligible candidate if the 10candidate is running against a candidate who does not receive 11a public financing benefit under this Act. 12    (c) If more than one candidate files an application for 13the general election, the State Board shall accept 14applications from all candidates who comply with subsection 15(a), but the State Board shall postpone the declaration of 16eligibility for the general election until after the general 17primary results are certified. After the results have been 18certified, if the nominee filed an application under 19subsection (a), the State Board shall declare that candidate 20eligible for the general election. 21    (d) The State Board shall distribute to each eligible 22candidate in the general election a line of credit for public 23financing not later than the earlier of (i) 48 hours after the 24official canvass and proclamation under Section 22-7 of the 25Election Code or (ii) 21 days after the date of the general 26primary election. No candidate may receive a line of credit   SB0143- 14 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1until all candidates for judicial office who apply and qualify 2for a public financing benefit have been certified as eligible 3candidates. 4    (e) The State Board shall distribute to eligible 5candidates revenues from the Fund in amounts in the following 6manner: 7        (1) for a candidate for the office of Judge of the 8    Supreme Court during a general election, $525,000; and9        (2) for a candidate for the office of Judge of the 10    Appellate Court during a general election, $175,000.11    (f) Beginning on April 1, 2028 and every 2 years 12thereafter, the State Board shall modify the public financing 13benefits provided for in subsection (e) to adjust for the 14change in the Consumer Price Index, All Items, U. S. City 15Average, published by the United States Department of Labor 16for the preceding 2-year period ending on December 31. 17    Section 35. Requirements for eligible candidates. 18    (a) An eligible candidate may not accept private 19contributions other than seed money contributions and 20qualifying contributions. An eligible candidate may only 21accept one qualifying contribution from each contributor.22    (b) In addition to reports required to be filed under the 23Election Code, a candidate who receives a public financing 24benefit shall furnish complete financial records, including 25records of seed money contributions, qualifying contributions,   SB0143- 15 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1and expenditures on the last day of each month. 2    (c) In addition to adhering to requirements imposed under 3the Election Code, a candidate who receives a public financing 4benefit shall maintain records of all contributions of at 5least $5, including seed money contributions and qualifying 6contributions. These records shall contain the full name of 7the contributor and the contributor's full home address. 8    (d) The failure to record or provide the information 9specified in subsection (c) disqualifies a contribution from 10counting as a qualifying contribution. 11    (e) No eligible candidate and no person acting on an 12eligible candidate's behalf may accept any contribution that 13is not recorded in accordance with subsection (c) in a 14candidate's campaign account. 15    (f) No eligible candidate may accept more than $1,000 in 16cash from any contributor. 17    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, eligible 18candidates shall report all campaign expenditures, 19obligations, and related activities to the State Board 20according to procedures developed by the State Board. 21    (h) The eligible candidate or the eligible candidate's 22treasurer shall obtain and keep: 23        (1) bank or other account statements for the campaign 24    account covering the duration of the campaign; 25        (2) a vendor invoice stating the particular goods or 26    services purchased for every expenditure of $50 or more;   SB0143- 16 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1    and2        (3) a record proving that a vendor received payment 3    for every expenditure of $50 or more in the form of a 4    cancelled check, receipt from the vendor, or bank or 5    credit card statement identifying the vendor as the payee. 6    (i) The eligible candidate or the eligible candidate's 7treasurer shall preserve the records for 2 years following the 8candidate's final campaign finance report for the election 9cycle. The candidate and treasurer shall submit photocopies of 10the records to the State Board upon its request. 11    Section 40. Unspent funds. Upon the filing of a final 12report for any primary election in which the eligible 13candidate was defeated and for all general elections, an 14eligible candidate shall return all unspent revenues from the 15Fund to the State Board. In developing procedures for the 16return of unspent revenues from the Fund, the State Board 17shall use existing campaign reporting procedures whenever 18practicable. The State Board shall ensure timely public access 19to campaign finance data and may use electronic means of 20reporting and storing information. 21    Section 45. Illinois Judicial Election Democracy Trust 22Fund. 23    (a) All moneys collected under Sections 40, 45, and 70 24shall be deposited into the Illinois Judicial Election   SB0143- 17 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1Democracy Trust Fund and may be used by the State Board for the 2purposes of this Act. The State Treasurer, in consultation 3with the State Board, shall contract with a debit card issuer 4to permit eligible candidates and their agents to draw upon 5moneys appropriated from the Fund through an account with the 6card issuer. 7    (b) Upon a determination of a candidate's eligibility for 8a public financing benefit under this Act, the State Treasurer 9shall issue to the eligible candidate a debit card, known as 10the fair election debit card, entitling the candidate and 11agents of the candidate designated by the candidate to draw 12money from an account to make expenditures on behalf of the 13candidate. 14    (c) No eligible candidate or agent of an eligible 15candidate may make any campaign expenditure by any means other 16than through the use of the fair election debit card after 17being certified as an eligible candidate. No candidate or 18agent may use a fair election debit card to obtain cash, except 19that cash amounts of $100 or less may be drawn on the fair 20election debit card and used to make expenditures of no more 21than $25 each. A candidate shall maintain records of all 22expenditures and shall report the expenditures to the State 23Board in accordance with Section 35. 24    (d) The State Board may draw upon moneys in the Fund to 25support the administration of the program. These moneys may be 26used only to pay costs to the State Board that are directly   SB0143- 18 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1associated with the administration of the program, including, 2but not limited to, ensuring compliance with this Act and 3promoting the income tax checkoff. These administrative 4reimbursements shall be limited to 1% of the Fund balance in 5fiscal years when there is no eligible seat on the ballot or 5% 6of the Fund balance in fiscal years when there is an eligible 7seat on either a primary or general election ballot. 8    Section 50. Challenges to certification of an eligible 9candidate. 10    (a) A candidate who has been denied certification as an 11eligible candidate, the opponent of a candidate who has been 12granted certification as an eligible candidate, or other 13interested persons may challenge a certification decision made 14by the State Board as follows: 15        (1) A challenger may appeal to the full State Board 16    within 7 days after the certification decision. The appeal 17    shall be in writing and shall set forth the reasons for the 18    appeal. 19        (2) Within 5 days after an appeal is properly made and 20    after notice is given to the challenger and any opponent, 21    the State Board shall hold a hearing. The appellant has 22    the burden of providing evidence to demonstrate that the 23    State Board decision was improper. The State Board shall 24    rule on the appeal within 3 days after the completion of 25    the hearing.   SB0143- 19 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1        (3) A challenger may appeal the decision of the State 2    Board in paragraph (2) by commencing an action in circuit 3    court. 4        (4) A candidate whose certification by the State Board 5    as an eligible candidate is revoked on appeal shall return 6    to the State Board any unspent revenues distributed from 7    the Fund. 8    (b) If the State Board or court finds that an appeal was 9made frivolously or to cause delay or hardship, the State 10Board or court may require the moving party to pay costs of the 11State Board, court, and opposing parties, if any. 12    Section 55. Rulemaking. The State Board shall adopt rules 13to ensure effective administration of this Act. These rules 14shall include, but shall not be limited to, rules concerning 15procedures for obtaining qualifying contributions, 16certification as an eligible candidate, circumstances 17involving special elections, vacancies, recounts, withdrawals 18or replacements, collection of revenues for the Fund, 19distribution of Fund revenue to certified candidates, return 20of unspent Fund disbursements, and compliance with this Act. 21    Section 60. Violations. 22    (a) In addition to any other penalties that may be 23applicable, a person who violates any provision of this Act or 24rules adopted by the State Board under Section 55 is subject to   SB0143- 20 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1a fine not to exceed $10,000 per violation, payable to the 2Fund. In addition to any fine, for good cause shown, a 3candidate, treasurer, consultant, or other agent of the 4candidate or the committee authorized by the candidate found 5in violation of this Act or rules of the State Board may be 6required to return to the Fund all amounts distributed to the 7candidate from the Fund or any funds not used for 8campaign-related purposes. If the State Board makes a 9determination that a violation of this Act or rules of the 10State Board has occurred, the State Board shall assess a fine 11or transmit the finding to the Attorney General for 12prosecution. Fines paid under this Section shall be deposited 13into the Fund. In determining whether or not a candidate is in 14violation of the expenditure limits of this Act, the State 15Board may consider as a mitigating factor any circumstances 16out of the candidate's control. 17    (b) A person who willfully or knowingly violates this Act 18or rules adopted under this Act or who willfully or knowingly 19makes a false statement in any report required by this Act 20commits a business offense punishable by a fine of at least 21$1,001 and not more than $5,000 and, if certified as an 22eligible candidate, shall return to the Fund all amounts 23distributed to the candidate. 24    Section 65. Study report. By January 30, 2026 and every 4 25years thereafter, the State Board shall prepare and submit to   SB0143- 21 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1the General Assembly a report documenting, evaluating, and 2making recommendations relating to the administration, 3implementation, and enforcement of this Act and the Illinois 4Judicial Election Democracy Trust Fund. 5    Section 70. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 6severable. If any provision of this Act is held invalid by a 7court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not 8affect other provisions of this Act that can be given effect 9without the invalid provision. 10    Section 900. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 11Section 5.1030 as follows: 12    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)13    Sec. 5.1030. The Illinois Judicial Election Democracy 14Trust Fund. 15    Section 905. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 16changing Section 509 and by adding Section 506.7 as follows: 17    (35 ILCS 5/506.7 new)18    Sec. 506.7. Designation of tax to the Illinois Judicial 19Election Democracy Trust Fund. The Department shall print on 20its standard individual income tax form a provision indicating 21that if the taxpayer wishes to contribute to the Illinois   SB0143- 22 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1Judicial Election Democracy Trust Fund, as authorized by this 2amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, he or she may do 3so by stating the amount of the contribution, not less than $3, 4on the return and that the contribution will reduce the 5taxpayer's refund or increase the amount of payment to 6accompany the return. Failure to remit any amount of the 7increased payment shall reduce the contribution accordingly. 8This Section does not apply to any amended return. This tax 9checkoff applies to income tax forms for taxable years 2026 10and thereafter. 11    (35 ILCS 5/509)  (from Ch. 120, par. 5-509)12    Sec. 509. Tax checkoff explanations. 13    (a) All individual income tax return forms shall contain 14appropriate explanations and spaces to enable the taxpayers to 15designate contributions to the funds to which contributions 16may be made under this Article 5.17    (b) Each form shall contain a statement that the 18contributions will reduce the taxpayer's refund or increase 19the amount of payment to accompany the return. Failure to 20remit any amount of increased payment shall reduce the 21contribution accordingly.22    (c) If, on October 1 of any year, the total contributions 23to any one of the funds made under this Article 5, except the 24Illinois Judicial Election Democracy Trust Fund, do not equal 25$100,000 or more, the explanations and spaces for designating   SB0143- 23 -LRB104 06845 SPS 16881 b1contributions to the fund shall be removed from the individual 2income tax return forms for the following and all subsequent 3years and all subsequent contributions to the fund shall be 4refunded to the taxpayer. This contribution requirement does 5not apply to the Diabetes Research Checkoff Fund checkoff 6contained in Section 507GG of this Act.7    (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 8Department shall include the Hunger Relief Fund checkoff 9established under Section 507SS on the individual income tax 10form for the taxable year beginning on January 1, 2012. If, on 11October 1, 2013, or on October 1 of any subsequent year, the 12total contributions to the Hunger Relief Fund checkoff do not 13equal $100,000 or more, the explanations and spaces for 14designating contributions to the fund shall be removed from 15the individual income tax return forms for the following and 16all subsequent years and all subsequent contributions to the 17fund shall be refunded to the taxpayer. 18(Source: P.A. 96-328, eff. 8-11-09; 97-1117, eff. 8-27-12.) 19    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 201, 2026.